District of Columbia statutes.
1-105

Former corporation continued for certain purposes.

The corporation of the District of Columbia is continued for all the purposes of this section and other acts, for the collection of taxes, for suing and being sued, for causes arising prior to June 20, 1874, and for acquiring and holding real estate for school and municipal purposes.

History

Mar. 3, 1877, 19 Stat. 402, ch. 117, § 15

Cross References

Control of school buildings, see § 38-401.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-401.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-105.
1973 Ed., § 1-105.